District of Columbia statutes.
9-920

Remedies.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or of any of the coupons appertaining to the bonds, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights given by this chapter, may be restricted by the trust agreement, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, injunction, mandamus or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the District, or granted by this chapter or under the trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by the agreement or resolution to be performed by the Authority or by any officer or agent of the Authority including the fixing, charging, and collection of fees or other charges.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 21, 32 DCR 6093
1981 Ed., § 7-1270.